Nevada, session 83, SB116.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 245.043 is hereby amended to read as follows:
245.043 1. As used in this section:
(a) “County” includes Carson City.
(b) “County commissioner” includes the Mayor and supervisors
of Carson City.
(c) “Elected officer” means a district attorney, sheriff, county
clerk, county assessor, county recorder, county treasurer and
public administrator.
2. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 5 and by any
special law, the] this section, each elected [officers] officer of [the
counties] a county of this State [are] is entitled to receive [,] for [the
appropriate fiscal year,] Fiscal Year 2025-2026, an annual [salaries]
salary in the base [amounts specified in the following table
commencing on July 1 of the fiscal year.] amount as determined
pursuant to subsection 3 or an amount that is calculated to be 3
percent more than the salary of the employee under the
supervision of the elected officer who has the highest salary of all
employees under the supervision of the elected officer, as
determined by the salaries of all employees under the supervision
of the elected officer on January 1, 2025, whichever is higher. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the annual salary of an elected officer
is the base salary for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 as adjusted pursuant
to subsection 4 or an amount that is calculated to be 3 percent
more than the salary of the employee under the supervision of the
elected officer who has the highest salary of all employees under
the supervision of the elected officer, as determined by the salaries
of all employees under the supervision of the elected officer on
July 1 of that fiscal year that have been approved by the board of
county commissioners, whichever is higher. The annual [salaries
are] salary is in full payment for all services required by law to be
performed by such [officers.] elected officer. Except as otherwise
provided by law, all fees and commissions collected by [such]
elected officers in the performance of their duties must be paid into
the county treasury each month without deduction of any nature.
For the purposes of this subsection, approval of a salary by a
board of county commissioners includes, without limitation, the
approval of a salary or pay increase where the board of county
commissioners:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) Was informed that the salary or pay increase would
increase the salary of an elected officer;
(b) Approved a collective bargaining agreement; or
(c) Approved a range of salaries for the department or division
that includes the position of the elected officer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the base
salary for each elected officer for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, is the
base salary that was in effect for Fiscal Year 2018-2019 pursuant
to this section, as it existed on July 1, 2015, adjusted for each
fiscal year starting with Fiscal Year 2019-2020 and ending with
Fiscal Year 2024-2025 by compounding the annual percentage
increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as published by the United States
Department of Labor.
4. A board of county commissioners may elect to provide a
cost-of-living increase of 2 percent to the base salary of each
elected officer. Such an increase may be provided annually or at
any time the board of county commissioners deems appropriate.
Each time the board of county commissioners provides such an
increase, the total increased salary becomes the base salary for
that elected officer for purposes of this section. A board of county
commissioners shall not use a cost-of-living increase as a one-time
pay incentive or bonus to increase the base salary of an elected
officer in such a manner that would prevent an increase to the
base salary of a person elected to such office at a later date.
5. The base salary of an elected officer as determined
pursuant to subsections 2, 3 and 4 does not:
(a) Include any increases to the salary of an elected officer for
longevity under NRS 245.044;
(b) Decrease when a new person is elected to that office; and
(c) Decrease when a person who is elected and has a base
salary which is more than 3 percent more than the salary of the
employee under the supervision of the elected officer who has the
highest salary of all employees under the supervision of the elected
officer.
[ANNUAL SALARIES
District County County County County Public
Class County Attorney Sheriff Clerk Assessor Recorder Treasurer Administrator
1 Clark
FY 2015-2016 $187,563 $161,692 $109,757 $109,757 $109,757 $109,757 $109,757
FY 2016-2017 193,190 166,543 113,050 113,050 113,050 113,050 113,050
FY 2017-2018 198,986 171,540 116,441 116,441 116,441 116,441 116,441
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
District County County County County Public
Class County Attorney Sheriff Clerk Assessor Recorder Treasurer Administrator
FY 2018-2019 $204,955 $176,685 $119,934 $119,934 $119,934 $119,934 $119,934
2 Washoe
FY 2015-2016 165,573 133,234 100,610 100,610 100,610 100,610 100,610
FY 2016-2017 170,540 137,231 103,629 103,629 103,629 103,629 103,629
FY 2017-2018 175,656 141,348 106,738 106,738 106,738 106,738 106,738
FY 2018-2019 180,926 145,588 109,940 109,940 109,940 109,940 109,940
3 Carson City
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Churchill
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Douglas
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Elko
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Humboldt
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Lyon
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
Nye
FY 2015-2016 118,872 98,567 78,293 78,293 78,293 78,293 --------
FY 2016-2017 122,438 101,524 80,642 80,642 80,642 80,642 --------
FY 2017-2018 126,112 104,570 83,061 83,061 83,061 83,061 --------
FY 2018-2019 129,895 107,707 85,553 85,553 85,553 85,553 --------
4 Lander
FY 2015-2016 112,268 88,711 65,305 65,305 65,305 65,305 --------
FY 2016-2017 115,636 91,372 67,264 67,264 67,264 67,264 --------
FY 2017-2018 119,105 94,113 69,282 69,282 69,282 69,282 --------
FY 2018-2019 122,678 96,937 71,361 71,361 71,361 71,361 --------
Storey
FY 2015-2016 112,268 88,711 65,305 65,305 65,305 65,305 --------
FY 2016-2017 115,636 91,372 67,264 67,264 67,264 67,264 --------
FY 2017-2018 119,105 94,113 69,282 69,282 69,282 69,282 --------
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
District County County County County Public
Class County Attorney Sheriff Clerk Assessor Recorder Treasurer Administrator
FY 2018-2019 $122,678 $96,937 $71,361 $71,361 $71,361 $71,361 --------
White Pine
FY 2015-2016 112,268 88,711 65,305 65,305 65,305 65,305 --------
FY 2016-2017 115,636 91,372 67,264 67,264 67,264 67,264 --------
FY 2017-2018 119,105 94,113 69,282 69,282 69,282 69,282 --------
FY 2018-2019 122,678 96,937 71,361 71,361 71,361 71,361 --------
5 Eureka
FY 2015-2016 99,060 70,968 58,537 58,537 58,537 58,537 --------
FY 2016-2017 102,033 73,097 60,293 60,293 60,293 60,293 --------
FY 2017-2018 105,093 75,290 62,102 62,102 62,102 62,102 --------
FY 2018-2019 108,246 77,549 63,965 63,965 63,965 63,965 --------
Lincoln
FY 2015-2016 99,060 70,968 58,537 58,537 58,537 58,537 --------
FY 2016-2017 102,033 73,097 60,293 60,293 60,293 60,293 --------
FY 2017-2018 105,093 75,290 62,102 62,102 62,102 62,102 --------
FY 2018-2019 108,246 77,549 63,965 63,965 63,965 63,965 --------
Mineral
FY 2015-2016 99,060 70,968 58,537 58,537 58,537 58,537 --------
FY 2016-2017 102,033 73,097 60,293 60,293 60,293 60,293 --------
FY 2017-2018 105,093 75,290 62,102 62,102 62,102 62,102 --------
FY 2018-2019 108,246 77,549 63,965 63,965 63,965 63,965 --------
Pershing
FY 2015-2016 99,060 70,968 58,537 58,537 58,537 58,537 --------
FY 2016-2017 102,033 73,097 60,293 60,293 60,293 60,293 --------
FY 2017-2018 105,093 75,290 62,102 62,102 62,102 62,102 --------
FY 2018-2019 108,246 77,549 63,965 63,965 63,965 63,965 --------
6 Esmeralda
FY 2015-2016 78,657 63,083 51,220 51,220 51,220 -------- --------
FY 2016-2017 81,017 64,976 52,756 52,756 52,756 -------- --------
FY 2017-2018 83,447 66,926 54,339 54,339 54,339 -------- --------
FY 2018-2019 85,951 68,933 55,969 55,969 55,969 -------- --------
 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the annual salaries
set forth in this subsection for Fiscal Year 2018-2019 are effective
for that fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.
3.] 6. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 5,] this
section, the annual salary for county commissioners commencing on
July 1 of [the fiscal year,] Fiscal Year 2025-2026 is:
(a) For [Fiscal Year 2015-2016, 103.00 percent;] Clark County,
$121,000;
(b) For [Fiscal Year 2016-2017, 106.09 percent;] Washoe
County, $116,000;
(c) For [Fiscal Year 2017-2018, 109.273 percent; and] Lyon
County, Carson City, Elko County, Nye County, Douglas County,
and Storey County, $39,000;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(d) For [Fiscal Year 2018-2019 and each fiscal year thereafter,
112.551 percent,] Churchill County and Humboldt County,
$36,000;
(e) For White Pine County and Pershing County, $33,000; and
(f) For Lander County, Mineral County, Lincoln County,
Eureka County and Esmeralda County, $30,000.
 [of the amount of the] The annual [salary or the county
commissioners of that county that was in effect on January 1, 2015.]
salaries set forth in this subsection for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 are
effective for that fiscal year. For the following 5 fiscal years, each
county commissioner is entitled to a 3 percent increase per fiscal
year. For each fiscal year thereafter, each county commissioner is
entitled to the salary that was in effect for that county
commissioner during Fiscal Year 2030-2031.
[4.] 7. Any elected officer or county commissioner who is
entitled to a salary pursuant to [subsection 2 or 3] this section may
elect not to receive any part of the salary to which he or she is
entitled pursuant to [subsection 2 or 3, as applicable.
5.] this section.
8. The increased annual salaries for [all] each elected [county
officers provided for in subsections 2 and 3] officer and county
commissioner for a fiscal year must not be paid in a fiscal year if
the board of county commissioners determines that sufficient
financial resources are not available to pay increased annual salaries
in that fiscal year . [and the annual salaries paid for those officers in
the immediately preceding fiscal year must continue to be paid.] If
increased annual salaries are paid in a subsequent fiscal year:
(a) Those increased annual salaries must be in the amounts
provided for in [subsections 2 and 3] this section. [starting with the
first fiscal year in which increased salaries were not paid because
sufficient financial resources were not available.]
(b) An elected [county] officer or county commissioner is not
entitled to any retroactive payment of the salary increase for any
previous fiscal year in which increased annual salaries were not
paid.
9. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a board of
county commissioners determines not to pay increased salaries
pursuant to subsection 8, the board of county commissioners may
pay each elected officer and county commissioner a reduced
salary. Any reduction in salary must be applied to all elected
officers and county commissioners using a calculation that is
equally proportional or using the same reduction calculation
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
applied to any other employee or group of employees of the
county, whichever is lower.
Sec. 2. NRS 245.0435 is hereby amended to read as follows:
245.0435 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 252.060,
the district attorneys in counties [of classes 1 to 5, inclusive, as
classified in the table of annual salaries,] whose population is 3,000
or more shall not engage in the private practice of law.
2. A district attorney who is permitted to engage in the private
practice of law shall disqualify himself or herself from any criminal
prosecution of a person who has been involved in a matter related to
the district attorney’s private practice of law.
3. As used in this section, “private practice of law” by a district
attorney means the performance of legal service, for compensation,
for any person or organization except the district attorney’s county
and any other governmental agency which the district attorney has a
statutory duty to serve.
Sec. 3. NRS 245.044 is hereby amended to read as follows:
245.044 1. On and after July 1, 1973, if an elected county
officer has served in his or her office for more than 4 years, the
officer is entitled to an additional salary of 2 percent of his or her
base salary [for the appropriate fiscal year as provided in subsection
2 of NRS 245.043 or his or her annual salary set pursuant to
subsection 3 of] as determined pursuant to NRS 245.043 [, as
applicable,] for each full calendar year the officer has served in his
or her office.
2. The additional salary to which an elected county officer is
entitled pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must be calculated on July 1 of each year by multiplying 2
percent of the base salary [for the appropriate fiscal year as provided
in subsection 2 of NRS 245.043 or the annual salary set pursuant to
subsection 3 of] as determined pursuant to NRS 245.043 [, as
applicable,] by the number of full calendar years the elected county
officer has served in his or her office; and
(b) Must not exceed 20 percent of the base salary [for the
appropriate fiscal year as provided in subsection 2 of] as determined
pursuant to NRS 245.043 . [or the annual salary set pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 245.043, as applicable.]
3. Any elected county officer who is entitled to additional
salary pursuant to subsection 1 may elect not to receive the
additional salary or any part of the additional salary.
4. Service on the Board of Supervisors of Carson City for the
initial term which began on July 1, 1969, and ended on the first
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Monday of January, 1973, shall be deemed to constitute 4 full
calendar years of service for the purposes of this section.
Sec. 4. NRS 252.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
252.060 1. If the district attorney dies, resigns, is removed,
disappears or is permanently disabled from performing the duties of
his or her office, the board of county commissioners shall appoint an
interim or permanent replacement for the district attorney.
2. If the district attorney is temporarily disabled from
performing the duties of his or her office:
(a) The chief deputy district attorney shall perform the duties of
the district attorney while the district attorney is disabled. The chief
deputy is entitled to the chief deputy’s regular salary while engaged
in the performance of those duties.
(b) If there is no chief deputy, the board of county
commissioners shall appoint an interim replacement for the district
attorney.
3. A person appointed as an interim or permanent replacement
for the district attorney pursuant to this section must be appointed at
the first regularly scheduled meeting of the board of county
commissioners following the event giving rise to the appointment.
Any such event occurring within the time provided by NRS 241.020
for notice of the meeting is an emergency within the meaning of that
section.
4. A person appointed as an interim replacement for the district
attorney pursuant to this section:
(a) Is entitled to receive the same salary as the district attorney.
(b) Shall:
(1) If he or she is appointed pursuant to subsection 1, serve
for not more than 60 days or until a permanent replacement is
appointed, whichever occurs first.
(2) If he or she is appointed pursuant to subsection 2, serve
for the duration of the disability of the district attorney or, if the
district attorney resigns or is removed from office, for not more than
60 days after the resignation or removal or until a permanent
replacement is appointed, whichever occurs first.
(c) May engage in the private practice of law for not more than
60 days after his or her appointment, to the extent permitted by NRS
245.0435. The limitation of time provided by this paragraph does
not apply in [any] a county [of class 6, as classified in the table of
annual salaries contained in NRS 245.043.] whose population is
less than 3,000.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
5. The provisions of NRS 245.170 govern the appointment of a
permanent replacement for the district attorney, the length of service
of the appointee and the election of a successor.
Sec. 5. Section 3.010 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
341, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1407, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.010 Mayor: Duties; salary.
1. The Mayor:
(a) Shall serve as a member of the Board and preside over
its meetings.
(b) Is the head of the government of Carson City for all
ceremonial purposes and for purposes of military law.
(c) Shall perform such emergency duties as may be
necessary for the general health, welfare and safety of Carson
City.
(d) Shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed
by ordinance or by the provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes
which apply to a mayor or to the chair of a board of county
commissioners.
2. The Mayor is entitled to an annual salary of 130
percent of the amount [specified in] as determined pursuant
to NRS 245.043.
Sec. 6. Section 3.030 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
270, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 1552, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.030 Clerk: Duties; salary.
1. The provisions of chapter 246 of NRS apply to the
Office of Clerk, except that all deputy clerks other than the
two provided for in section 2.330 must be appointed pursuant
to and are governed by the regulations for the Merit Personnel
System.
2. The Clerk shall:
(a) Keep the corporate seal and all books and papers
belonging to Carson City.
(b) Attend all meetings of the Board and keep an accurate
journal of its proceedings, including a record of all
ordinances, bylaws and resolutions passed or adopted by it.
After approval of the journal at each meeting of the Board,
the Clerk shall attest the journal after it has been signed by
the Mayor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(c) Enter in the journal the results of the vote of the Board
upon the passage of ordinances or of any resolution
appropriating money, abolishing licenses, or increasing or
decreasing the rates of licenses.
(d) Act as ex officio Recorder. The provisions of chapter
247 of NRS apply to the Clerk while acting in that capacity,
except that all deputy recorders other than the two provided
for in section 2.330 must be appointed pursuant to and as
governed by the regulations for the Merit Personnel System.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 253.125, serve
as Public Administrator without additional salary. The
provisions of chapter 253 of NRS apply to the Office of Clerk
while performing the duties of Public Administrator.
(f) Perform such other duties as may be required by:
(1) The Board; or
(2) The provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes,
 which apply to county clerks.
3. The Clerk is entitled to an annual salary [in the
amount specified in] as determined pursuant to NRS
245.043. The Clerk shall not engage in any other business or
occupation that creates a conflict of interest between his or
her personal interest in the business or occupation and his
or her official duties.
Sec. 7. Section 3.045 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 23, Statutes of Nevada 1987, as last amended by chapter
341, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1409, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.045 Treasurer: Duties; salary.
1. The provisions of chapter 249 of NRS apply to the
Office of Treasurer, except that all deputy treasurers other
than the two provided for in section 2.330 must be appointed
pursuant to and are governed by the regulations for the Merit
Personnel System.
2. The Treasurer shall:
(a) Invest all surplus money of Carson City.
(b) Keep a record of the cash balance and reconcile it
with the Controller’s records monthly.
(c) Perform such other duties as may be required by:
(1) The Board; or
(2) The provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes,
 which apply to county treasurers.
(d) Establish and maintain a policy for the investment of
the surplus money of Carson City. The Board of Supervisors
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
shall review the policy at least once each year at a public
hearing at which public comment is accepted.
3. The Treasurer is entitled to an annual salary [in the
amount specified in] as determined pursuant to
NRS 245.043. The Treasurer shall not engage in any other
business or occupation that creates a conflict of interest
between his or her personal interest in the business or
occupation and his or her official duties.
Sec. 8. Section 3.050 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
341, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1409, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.050 Assessor: Duties; salary.
1. The provisions of chapter 250 of NRS apply to the
Office of Assessor, except that all deputy assessors other than
the two provided for in section 2.330 must be appointed
pursuant to and are governed by the regulations for the Merit
Personnel System.
2. The Assessor shall perform such other duties as may
be required by:
(a) The Board; or
(b) The provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes,
 which apply to county assessors.
3. The Assessor is entitled to an annual salary [in the
amount specified in] as determined pursuant to NRS
245.043. The Assessor shall not engage in any other business
or occupation that creates a conflict of interest between his or
her personal interest in the business or occupation and his or
her official duties.
Sec. 9. Section 3.060 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
238, Statutes of Nevada 2007, at page 815, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.060 Sheriff: Duties; salary.
1. The provisions of chapter 248 of NRS apply to the
Office of Sheriff, except that all deputy sheriffs except any
deputy sheriff who is one of the six employees designated by
the Sheriff as described in section 2.330 must be appointed
pursuant to and are governed by the regulations for the Merit
Personnel System.
2. The Sheriff shall:
(a) Diligently enforce all ordinances of Carson City.
(b) Perform such other duties as may be required by:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(1) The Board; or
(2) The provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes,
 which apply to county sheriffs.
3. The Sheriff is not answerable upon his or her official
bond for the conduct of deputies appointed pursuant to the
provisions of this Charter, but the Board may require of such
deputies such bonds as it may deem proper.
4. The Sheriff is entitled to an annual salary [in the
amount specified in] as determined pursuant to NRS
245.043. The Sheriff shall not engage in any other business or
occupation that creates a conflict of interest between his or
her personal interest in the business or occupation and his
or her official duties.
Sec. 10. Section 3.070 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
341, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 1410, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 3.070 District Attorney: Duties; salary.
1. The provisions of chapter 252 of NRS apply to the
Office of District Attorney for Carson City but:
(a) All deputy district attorneys serve at the pleasure of
the District Attorney; and
(b) Deputy district attorneys shall not engage in the
private practice of law after July 1, 1979.
2. The District Attorney shall perform such other duties
as may be required by:
(a) The Board; or
(b) The provisions of Nevada Revised Statutes,
 which apply to county district attorneys.
3. The District Attorney may, subject to the approval of
the Board, contract for the services of special deputy district
attorneys.
4. The District Attorney is entitled to an annual salary
[in the amount specified in] as determined pursuant to
NRS 245.043.
5. The District Attorney shall not engage in the private
practice of law or any other business or occupation that
creates a conflict of interest between his or her personal
interest in the business or occupation and his or her official
duties.
Sec. 11. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Government Affairs may review the
following issues relating to county commissions:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(a) Whether county commissioners should serve full-time
without having any other employment or part-time with the
authorization for additional employment; and
(b) The appropriate salary for county commissioners.
2. If the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Government
Affairs reviews the issues relating to county commissioners
described in subsection 1, the Committee shall include any findings
and recommendations for proposed legislation in the report that is
required pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 218E.330.
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)